Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1934
Money judgment; enforcement notwithstanding supersedeas; undertaking required.

In an action arising on contract for the payment of money only, notwithstanding the execution of an undertaking to stay proceedings, if the defendant in error or appellee give adequate security to make restitution in case the judgment is reversed or modified, he may upon leave obtained from the court below, or a judge thereof in vacation, proceed to enforce the judgment. Such security must be an undertaking executed to the plaintiff in error by at least two sufficient sureties, to the effect that if the judgment be reversed or modified, he will make full restitution to the plaintiff in error or appellee of the money by him received under the judgment.

R.S.1867, Code § 591, p. 498;

R.S.1913, § 8206;

C.S.1922, § 9159;

C.S.1929, § 20-1934;

R.S.1943, § 25-1934.

Defendant's payment of judgment to avoid sale of his property on execution will not deprive him of right to appeal. Burke v. Dendinger, 120 Neb. 594, 234 N.W. 405 (1931).

Unless appellee has given bond, he cannot plead judgment as set off to another action. Spencer v. Johnston, 58 Neb. 44, 78 N.W. 482 (1899).

If appellee gives bond and has leave to enforce, appellant cannot enjoin. Bodewig v. Standard Cattle Co., 56 Neb. 217, 76 N.W. 580 (1898).